Utah statutes.
78B-6-134.   Custody pending final decree.
(1)  Except as otherwise provided by the court, once a petitioner has received
the adoptee into his home and a petition for adoption has been filed, the
petitioner is entitled to the custody and control of the adoptee and is
responsible for the care, maintenance, and support of the adoptee, including
any necessary medical or surgical treatment, pending further order of the
court.
(2)  Once a child has been placed with, relinquished to, or ordered into the
custody of a child-placing agency for purposes of adoption, the agency shall
have custody and control of the child and is responsible for his care,
maintenance, and support.  The agency may delegate the responsibility for
care, maintenance, and support, including any necessary medical or surgical
treatment, to the petitioner once the petitioner has received the child into
his home.  However, until the final decree of adoption is entered by the
court, the agency has the right to the custody and control of the child.
